Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 30. Titles and Interests
38-30-128.
Prima facie validity of prior foreign acknowledgments.

All deeds and other instruments in writing relating to real estate in this state which have been executed prior to April 23, 1909, purporting to have been acknowledged or proved out of this state before any judge, or clerk, or deputy clerk of any court of record of any foreign kingdom, empire, republic, state, principality, province, colony, island possession, or bailiwick certifying the acknowledgment under the seal of such court, or purporting to have been acknowledged or proved before the chief magistrate or other chief executive or chief officer of any province, colony, island possession, or bailiwick of such foreign kingdom, empire, republic, state, or principality, such chief magistrate or other chief officer of any such colony, island possession, or bailiwick certifying the same under the seal of such colony, island possession, or bailiwick; or purporting to have been acknowledged or proved before a notary public having a seal, or before the mayor or other chief executive officers of any city, town, borough, county, or municipal corporation having a seal, of any such foreign kingdom, empire, republic, state, principality, province, colony, island possession, or bailiwick, such mayor or other chief officer certifying such acknowledgment under such seal; or purporting to have been acknowledged or proved out of this state and within any such kingdom, empire, republic, state, principality, province, colony, island possession, or bailiwick, before any ambassador, minister, consul, vice-consul, consular agent, vice-consular agent, charge d’affaires, commercial agent, vice-commercial agent, or any diplomatic, consular, or commercial agent or representative, or any deputy of any thereof, of the United States or of any other government or country, appointed to reside in the foreign country or place where the proof or acknowledgment is made, certifying the same under the seal of his office, shall be deemed prima facie to have been acknowledged or proved before proper officers, and such deeds or other instrument in writing, and in case of the loss of the originals, a copy of the record thereof, and of the certificate of the acknowledgment or proof appertaining to the same, shall be received as prima facie evidence of the execution and acknowledgment thereof, anything in the statutes of this state to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Source:
L. 09:

P. 33, § 1.

C.L.

§ 4892.

CSA:

C. 40, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-28.

38-30-129.
Clerk of U.S. courts may take acknowledgments.

Deeds, bonds, and agreements in writing conveying lands or any interest therein, or affecting title thereto, may be acknowledged or proved before any clerk of the circuit or district court of the United States, for the district of Colorado, or any deputy of such clerk, such clerk or deputy clerk certifying such acknowledgment under the seal of such court respectively.

History.

Source: L. 1879:

P. 5, § 1.

G.S.

§ 211.

R.S. 08:

§ 685.

C.L.

§ 4893.

CSA:

C. 40, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-29.

38-30-130.
Governor may appoint commissioners of deeds.

The governor may appoint and commission in any other state, in the District of Columbia, in each of the territories of the United States, and in any foreign country one or more commissioners, who shall keep a seal of office and continue in office during the pleasure of the governor and shall have authority to take the acknowledgment or proof of the execution of any deed or other conveyance or lease of any lands lying in this state or of any contract, letters of attorney, or any other writing under seal, or note to be used and recorded in this state, and such commissioners appointed for any foreign country shall also have authority to certify to the official character, signature, or seal of any officer within their district who is authorized to take acknowledgments or declarations under oath.

History.

Source: L. 1885:

P. 147, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 686.

C.L.

§ 4894.

CSA:

C. 40, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-30.

38-30-131.
Oath of commissioner of deeds.

Every such commissioner, before performing any duty or exercising any power by virtue of his appointment, shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation, before a judge or clerk of one of the courts of record of the district, territory, state, or country in which such commissioner resides or before any ambassador, minister, consul or vice-consul, consular agent, vice-consular agent, charge d’affaires, or any diplomatic, consular, or commercial agent or representative of the United States appointed for the foreign state or country in which such commissioner resides, well and faithfully to execute and perform all the duties of such commissioner under and by virtue of the laws of the state of Colorado, which oath, and an impression of the seal of office, together with his signature thereto, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state of this state within six months after the date of appointment.

History.

Source: L. 1885:

P. 148, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 687.

C.L.

§ 4895.

CSA:

C. 40, § 27.

L. 37:

P. 470, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-31.

38-30-132.
Effect of commissioner’s acknowledgment.

Such acknowledgment or proof so taken according to the laws of this state, and certified by any such commissioner under his seal of office, annexed to or endorsed on such instrument, shall have the same force and effect as if the same had been made before a judge or any other officer authorized to perform such act in this state.

History.

Source: L. 1885:

P. 148, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 688.

C.L.

§ 4896.

CSA:

C. 40, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-32.

L. 64:

P. 307, § 270.

38-30-133.
Commissioner has power to administer oath.

Every commissioner has the power to administer any oath, which may be lawfully required in this state, to any person willing to take it and to take and certify all depositions to be used in any of the courts of this state, in conformity with the laws thereof, either on interrogations proposed under commission from a court of this state or by consent of parties, and all such acts shall be as valid as if done and certified according to law by a magistrate of this state.

History.

Source: L. 1885:

P. 148, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 689.

C.L.

§ 4897.

CSA:

C. 40, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-33.

38-30-134.
Fees of commissioners.

Commissioners, for like services, shall be allowed the same fees as are allowed by law to notaries public of this state.

History.

Source: L. 1885:

P. 148, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 690.

C.L.

§ 4898.

CSA:

C. 40, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-34.

38-30-135.
Officer shall subscribe certificate.

Every certificate of the acknowledgment or proof of any deed, bond, agreement, power of attorney, or other writing for the conveyance of real estate, or any interest therein or affecting title thereto, shall be subscribed by the officer certifying the same with his proper hand and shall be endorsed upon or attached to such deed or other writing.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 113, § 22.

G.L.

§ 180.

G.S.

§ 220.

R.S. 08:

§ 692.

C.L.

§ 4900.

CSA:

C. 40, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-35.

38-30-136.
Subsequent proof of execution - proof or acknowledgment of copy.

When any deed or instrument of writing has been executed and not acknowledged according to law at the time of the execution thereof, such deed or instrument of writing may at any subsequent time be acknowledged by the makers thereof in the manner provided in this article, or proof may be made of the execution thereof before any officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds in the manner provided in this section. Such officer, when the fact is not within his own knowledge, shall ascertain from the testimony of at least one competent, credible witness, to be sworn and examined by him, that the person offering to prove the execution of such deed or writing is a subscribing witness thereto. Thereupon such officer shall examine such subscribing witness upon oath or affirmation, and shall reduce his testimony to writing and require the witness to subscribe the same, endorsed upon or attached to such deed or other writing, and shall thereupon grant a certificate that such witness was personally known or was proved to him by the testimony of at least one witness (who shall be named in such certificate) to be a subscribing witness to the deed or instrument of writing to be proved, that such subscribing witness was lawfully sworn and examined by him, and that the testimony of the said officer was reduced to writing and by said subscribing witness subscribed in his presence.

If by the testimony it appears that such witness saw the person, whose name is subscribed to such instrument of writing, sign, seal, and deliver the same or that such person afterwards acknowledged the same to the said witness to be his free and voluntary act or deed and that such witness subscribed the said deed or instrument of writing in attestation thereof, in the presence and with the consent of the person so executing the same, such proof if attested and the authority of the officer to take the same duly proved in the same manner as required in the case of acknowledgment, shall have the same force and effect as an acknowledgment of said deed or instrument of writing by the person executing the same, and duly certified.

When any such deed or instrument of writing has been executed and recorded without due proof, attestation or acknowledgment as required by law, a certified copy from such record may be proved or acknowledged in the same manner and with like effect as the original thereof. No person shall be permitted to use such certified copy so proved as evidence except upon satisfactory proof that the original thereof has been lost or destroyed or is beyond his power to produce.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 109, § 15.

G.L.

§ 174.

G.S.

§ 213.

R.S. 08:

§ 693.

C.L.

§ 4901.

CSA:

C. 40, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-36.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-36.

38-30-137.
Recording of leases based on crop rentals.

In any case where agricultural lands are leased upon a crop rental basis and the landlord receives under the terms of the lease a share of the crop in lieu of a cash rental, such lease may be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the lands leased, or the major part thereof, are situated. The filing of such lease shall be notice to all persons of the right of the landlord or lessor in and to any crops grown on said lands. Any purchaser of any such crop, or of any part thereof, shall be bound to take notice of the rights of the lessor therein and shall be accountable to such lessor for the purchase price of any such crop to the extent of the lessor’s interest therein.

History.

Source:
L. 25:

P. 177, § 1.

CSA:

C. 40, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-37.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-37.

38-30-138.
Filing and recording fee.

The fee for filing and recording such lease shall be the same as that now provided by law for the recording of deeds of real estate.

History.

Source:
L. 25:

P. 177, § 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-38.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-38.

38-30-139.
Photographic copies deemed recording. (Repealed)

History.

Source:
L. 17:

P. 400, § 1.

C.L.

§ 4904.

CSA:

C. 40, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-39.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-39.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1561, § 13, effective July 1.

38-30-140.
Foreign deeds - translation - proof - not recorded without.

Deeds, bonds, agreements in writing, and powers of attorney for the conveyance of lands, or any interest therein, or affecting the title thereto executed in any foreign country, and the acknowledgment or proof of execution thereof, may be executed, heard, taken, and certified in the language of such foreign country, and there shall be attached thereto a translation into the English language by any person learned in the language of such foreign country and by such person sworn to be a true and correct translation thereof before any officer or court authorized to take the acknowledgment of deeds. Such deed, bond, agreement, or power of attorney, and the certificate of acknowledgment or proof thereof, may be read in evidence and recorded with like effect as if written in the English language. Such translation shall not be conclusive upon any party desiring to question the correctness thereof. No such deed or other writing shall be entitled to record unless accompanied by such sworn translation.

History.

Source: R.S.

P.113, § 21.

G.L.

§ 179.

G.S.

§ 219.

R.S. 08:

§ 698.

C.L.

§ 4908.

CSA:

C. 40, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-40.

38-30-141.
Conveyance by county or municipality.

The board of county commissioners of any county, or the common council of any city, or the board of trustees of any town may, by order to be entered of record among the proceedings of any such board or council, appoint a commissioner to sell and convey any real estate belonging to such county, city, or town and to affix to any conveyance thereof the seal of such county, city, or town. Any such conveyance, executed in accordance with such order, shall have the effect of transferring to the grantee named all the estate of such county, city, or town in the real estate so conveyed. Nothing in this section shall be so construed as to prevent any such board of county commissioners from selling and conveying any such real estate belonging to such county by deed or conveyance signed and acknowledged by each member of said board and attested by the signature of the county clerk and recorder and the official seal of said county. Nothing in this section shall be so construed as to prevent any such board of trustees or city council from conveying any real estate belonging to such town or city by deed or conveyance signed and acknowledged by the mayor of said town or city, attested by the signature of the town or city clerk and by the official seal of such town or city, when any such mayor and clerk are authorized to do so by ordinance or by a vote of the residents thereof, as the case may be.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 181.

L. 1881:

P. 64, § 1.

G.S.

§ 221.

R.S. 08:

§ 699.

C.L.

§ 4909.

CSA:

C. 40, § 38.

L. 47:

P. 357, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-41.

38-30-142.
Prior deeds and conveyances by commissioners validated.

All deeds and conveyances of any real estate, formerly belonging to any county conveyed prior to April 4, 1947, by deed signed and acknowledged by the members of the board of county commissioners of such county and attested by the county clerk and recorder of such county, with the official seal thereof affixed, shall be deemed and held to be legal, valid, and binding conveyances of the real estate therein described in all respects and in the same manner as though said deeds or conveyances had been signed by a commissioner appointed for the purpose of selling and conveying the same on behalf of such county.

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 358, § 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 38(1).

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-43.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-42.

38-30-143.
Prior deeds and conveyances by council validated.

All deeds and conveyances of any real estate, formerly belonging to any town or city conveyed prior to April 4, 1947, by deed signed and acknowledged by the mayor and attested by the clerk with the official seal of any such town or city affixed, shall be deemed and held to be legal, valid, and binding conveyances of the real estate therein described in all respects and in the same manner as though said deeds or conveyances had been signed by a commissioner appointed for the purpose of selling and conveying the same on behalf of such town or city.

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 358, § 3.

CSA:

C. 40, § 38(2).

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-44.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-43.

38-30-144.
Conveyance by corporation.

A private corporation, authorized by law to convey, mortgage, or lease any of its real estate, may convey, mortgage, or lease the same in the manner authorized by articles 30 to 44 of this title or by instrument under its common seal, subscribed by its president, vice-president, or other head officer.

Any corporate instrument affecting title to real property, executed by the president, vice-president, or other head officer of the corporation, in the form required or permitted by law, shall be deemed to have been executed with proper authority in the usual course of business, and shall be binding and conclusive upon the corporation as to any bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or other person relying on such instrument.

There shall be filed or recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of each county where a corporation owns real property:

A certificate of incorporation of a domestic corporation or a certified copy thereof; if the articles of incorporation limit the duration of the corporate life to less than perpetuity, or limit or impose conditions upon the exercise of the statutory powers of the corporation with respect to real property, then a certified copy of said articles;

Where an amendment to the articles of incorporation changes the name or the period of duration of a domestic corporation, or limits or imposes conditions upon the exercise of the statutory powers of the corporation with respect to real property, the certificate of amendment or a certified copy thereof, and, if the certificate of amendment does not set forth such amendment, a certified copy of the articles of amendment;

A certified copy of restated articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation;

A certificate of merger of a domestic corporation or a certified copy thereof;

A certificate of consolidation of a domestic corporation or a certified copy thereof;

A certificate of dissolution of a domestic corporation or a certified copy thereof;

A certified copy of a decree of involuntary dissolution of a domestic corporation;

A certificate of authority of a foreign corporation or a certified copy thereof; if the articles of incorporation limit the duration of the corporate life to less than perpetuity or if they limit or impose conditions upon the exercise of any corporate power described in section 7-103-102, C.R.S., with respect to real property, then a certified copy of the articles of incorporation and amendments thereto;

Where an amendment to the articles of incorporation changes the name or the period of duration of a foreign corporation or limits or imposes conditions upon the exercise of any corporate power described in section 7-103-102, C.R.S., with respect to real property, a certified copy of such amendment;

Where a foreign corporation procures an amended certificate of authority evidencing a change in its corporate name, such amended certificate of authority or a certified copy thereof;

A certificate of withdrawal from this state of a foreign corporation or a certified copy thereof.

The failure to file any of the documents set forth in subsection (3) of this section in the office of any county clerk and recorder in this state shall not affect or impair the validity of such document; but any corporation which is required by subsection (3) of this section to file or record documents in addition to the certificate of incorporation or the certificate of authority but which has not filed or recorded such documents at the time any person acquires any interest in or lien upon real property from said corporation shall, as against such person and those claiming under him, be conclusively deemed to be an existing corporation qualified to exercise the powers described in section 7-103-102, C.R.S.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 113, § 24.

G.L.

§ 182.

G.S.

§ 222.

R.S. 08:

§ 700.

C.L.

§ 4910.

CSA:

C. 40, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-45.

L. 57:

P. 610, § 1.

L. 59:

P. 636, § 1.

L. 63:

P. 253, § 31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-44.

L. 93:

(3)(h), (3)(i), and (4) amended, p. 864, § 39, effective July 1, 1994.

38-30-145.
Conveyance by sheriff.

Deeds, executed by any sheriff or other officer for real estate sold upon execution, or pursuant to the decree or order of any court, shall be acknowledged or proved and admitted to record in like manner and with like effect as other deeds. The successor in office of any sheriff or other officer shall have authority to execute deeds for real estate sold by his predecessor upon execution at law, or the judgment, order, or decree of any court of equity.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 113, § 26.

G.L.

§ 184.

G.S.

§ 224.

R.S. 08:

§ 702.

C.L.

§ 4912.

CSA:

C. 40, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-46.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-45.

38-30-146.
Fraternal society may hold and convey real estate.

Any odd fellows or masonic lodge or other like benevolent and fraternal society duly chartered by its grand body according to the laws, constitution, and usages of such fraternity, and not wishing to become a corporate body, may take and hold real estate for its use and benefit by purchase, grant, devise, gift, or otherwise in and by the name and number of said body according to the respective registers of the grand body under which the same may be held, and the presiding officer of such body, together with the secretary thereof, may make conveyances of any real estate belonging to such body, when authorized by said body, under such regulations as the said society or its grand body may see fit to make. All such conveyances shall be attested by the seal of said subordinate body.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 85, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 703.

C.L.

§ 4913.

CSA:

C. 40, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-47.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-46.

38-30-147.
Presiding officer may bring suit to protect property.

Should it become necessary at any time to protect the rights of such body in and to real estate or personal property, the presiding officer thereof may bring suit in his own name for the benefit of the lodge or society over which he presides, in any court of record of this state having original jurisdiction and may prosecute or defend the same in the supreme court of the state.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 86, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 704.

C.L.

§ 4914.

CSA:

C. 40, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-48.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-47.

38-30-148.
Joint property of fraternal society.

In case any property is held jointly by two or more such bodies or lodges, the presiding officers of each of said bodies or lodges holding jointly may unite in bringing suit in their own names for the benefit of bodies or lodges over which they preside.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 86, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 705.

C.L.

§ 4915.

CSA:

C. 40, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-49.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-48.

38-30-149.
Change of presiding officer not to affect suit.

No suit instituted as provided in sections 38-30-147 and 38-30-148 shall be dismissed on account of any change of the presiding officer of said lodge, but the same shall continue in the name of the party instituting the suit until otherwise disposed of.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 86, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 706.

C.L.

§ 4916.

CSA:

C. 40, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-50.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-49.

38-30-150.
Definitions.

As used in articles 30 to 44 (except part 2 of article 41) of this title 38 and part 5 of article 10 of title 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Deed” includes mortgages, leases, releases, and every conveyance or encumbrance under seal.

“Land” and “real estate” shall be construed as coextensive in meaning with the terms “land”, “tenements”, and “hereditaments” and as embracing all mining claims and other claims, and chattels real.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 114, § 27.

G.L.

§ 185.

G.S.

§ 225.

R.S. 08:

§ 707.

C.L.

§ 4917.

CSA:

C. 40, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-51.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-50.

L. 2019:

IP amended,(HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1723, § 232, effective October 1.

38-30-151.
Division of county - transcript of records - certificate.

Whenever any county has been divided and a portion of the territory thereof erected into a new county, or added to some other county, the board of county commissioners of such new county or of the county to which such territory is added may, at the expense of its own county, procure to be transcribed from the records of the county to which such territory was originally attached copies of all deeds, bonds, agreements, powers of attorney, and other writings conveying or affecting title to any real estate situate within the territory so separated, and for this purpose the person whom such board may appoint shall have free access at all reasonable times to the records of the original county.

Such records shall be transcribed into a suitable and well-bound book, and the person transcribing the same shall affix thereto at the end of all such transcripts his affidavit that the same were by him transcribed from the records of such original county, and are true, correct, and examined copies of such records. Such book of transcribed records shall be deposited in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the new county, or of the county to which such territory is assigned, as a part of the records thereof; and such transcribed records or copies therefrom, certified by the county clerk and recorder in whose office the same are deposited, shall have the same effect as evidence as the original records of such deeds, bonds, agreements, powers of attorney, and other writings.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 114, § 28.

G.L.

§ 186.

G.S.

§ 226.

R.S. 08:

§ 708.

C.L.

§ 4918.

CSA:

C. 40, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-52.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-51.

38-30-152.
Not applicable to wills.

This article shall not be so construed as to embrace last wills and testaments except where expressly provided otherwise.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 115, § 31.

G.L.

§ 189.

G.S.

§ 229.

R.S. 08:

§ 709.

C.L.

§ 4919.

CSA:

C. 40, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-53.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-52.

38-30-153.
Recording wills and decrees affecting lands - descents.

Any will in writing for the devise of real estate in this state, together with the probate thereof and the certificate mentioned in section 38-30-154, may be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of every county wherein any of such real estate so devised may be situated; and all other decrees in probate determining the descent of real estate, together with the certificate mentioned in section 38-30-154, may in like manner be recorded. In case any decree or order, by certified copy or otherwise, of any appellate court is or shall be filed in any court for the government thereof in the premises, a copy of the same shall be attached to any such will and probate thereof, or to such decree, as the case may be, and certified with the other papers.

History.

Source: L. 1881:

P. 254, § 1.

G.S.

§ 230.

R.S. 08:

§ 710.

C.L.

§ 4920.

CSA:

C. 40, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-54.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-53.

L. 73:

P. 1414, § 85.

38-30-154.
Clerk shall furnish certified copies.

The clerk of any court, upon demand, shall furnish to any party in interest copies of any such papers and records properly attached and certified by him under the seal of such court, and the same shall thereupon be admitted to record accordingly.

History.

Source: L. 1881:

P. 254, § 2.

G.S.

§ 231.

R.S. 08:

§ 711.

C.L.

§ 4921.

CSA:

C. 40, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-55.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-54.

L. 73:

P. 1414, § 86.

38-30-155.
Certified copy of record shall be evidence of title.

Such record of any such certified will and probate thereof, and of any such decree, and of said accompanying papers and records in relation to any such will or decree shall be received in all courts of this state as evidence of the title to any real estate so devised by will or determined by decree, to the same extent as the record of deeds to real estate in such office.

History.

Source: L. 1881:

P. 255, § 3.

G.S.

§ 232.

R.S. 08:

§ 712.

C.L.

§ 4922.

CSA:

C. 40, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-56.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-55.

38-30-156.
Fees for county clerk and recorder.

The county clerk and recorder shall be entitled to the same fee as in other cases of the certification of copies of records in his office, and any such county clerk and recorder shall be entitled to the same fee as in cases of deeds to real estate.

History.

Source: L. 1881:

P. 255, § 4.

G.S.

§ 233.

R.S. 08:

§ 713.

C.L.

§ 4923.

CSA:

C. 40, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-57.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-56.

38-30-157.
Same use prohibition or restriction repeated in subsequent instruments taking effect on or after January 1, 1966 - exception.

If any inter vivos instrument taking effect on or after January 1, 1966, or if the will of any testator dying on or after such date, or if any appointment made on or after such date, including an appointment by inter vivos instrument or will under a power created before such date, purports to convey or devise any interest in real property on a special limitation or subject to a condition subsequent which prohibits or restricts a use of such interest in real property which has been purportedly or in fact previously prohibited or restricted by an earlier conveyance or devise or appointment on a special limitation or subject to a condition subsequent, it shall be conclusively deemed and held that no new special limitation or possibility of reverter or condition subsequent or right of entry is thereby created with respect to such use, whether or not any such earlier special limitation or condition subsequent is still enforceable, unless the grantor in such inter vivos instrument or the testator in such will or the person who exercises such power of appointment expressly recites in such inter vivos instrument or such will or such appointment that he intends to create a new special limitation and possibility of reverter or a new condition subsequent and right of entry, and that he intends the same to be in addition to any other special limitation and possibility of reverter and any other condition subsequent and right of entry which may be then in existence. In the absence of such express recital, which may appear in a codicil to any will making such a devise or appointment, such language of special limitation and possibility of reverter or of condition subsequent and right of entry shall be conclusively deemed and held to be only a recognition of any prior special limitation and possibility of reverter and condition subsequent and right of entry which may be then in existence.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no presumption of intent shall be applied to any such conveyance or appointment by inter vivos instrument executed prior to April 26, 1965, but taking effect after January 1, 1966, where the person executing such inter vivos instrument, at any time between April 26, 1965, and January 1, 1966, lacks as a matter of law the capacity or power to add the express recital provided in subsection (1) of this section to such inter vivos instrument if a notice of claim, such as that required by sections 38-30-159 and 38-30-160, is filed for record in the manner set forth in said sections within one year after January 1, 1966; nor shall any presumption of intent be applied to any will making such a devise or appointment executed prior to April 26, 1965, where the testator or person making such appointment by will lacks testamentary capacity at any time between April 26, 1965, and January 1, 1966, and dies on or after January 1, 1966, if a notice of claim such as that required by sections 38-30-159 and 38-30-160 is filed for record in the manner set forth in said sections within one year after his death.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 937, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-57.

38-30-158.
Record notice required for same use prohibition or restriction repeated in subsequent instruments taking effect prior to January 1, 1966 - exception - affidavit as to ownership and possession.

If any inter vivos instrument taking effect prior to January 1, 1966, or if the will of any testator dying prior to such date, or if any appointment made prior to such date, including an appointment by inter vivos instrument or will, purports to convey or devise any interest in real property on a special limitation or subject to a condition subsequent which prohibits or restricts a use of such interest in real property which has been purportedly or in fact previously prohibited or restricted by an earlier conveyance or devise or appointment on a special limitation or subject to a condition subsequent, it shall be conclusively deemed and held that no new special limitation or possibility of reverter or condition subsequent or right of entry was thereby created with respect to such use, unless a notice of claim to the contrary is filed for record within one year after January 1, 1966, in the manner provided by sections 38-30-159 and 38-30-160; except that if on January 1, 1966, any person is the owner of and in possession of any such interest in real property by reason of the occurrence prior to said date of the use prohibited or restricted by a special limitation or condition subsequent, such person shall not be required to file any notice in order to preserve the validity at the time of such occurrence of the special limitation and possibility of reverter or of the condition subsequent and right of entry upon which his ownership and possession are dependent.

If such notice of claim to the contrary is not filed for record, except when not required as provided in subsection (1) of this section, such language of special limitation and possibility of reverter or of condition subsequent and right of entry shall be conclusively deemed and held to have been only a recognition of any prior special limitation and possibility of reverter and condition subsequent and right of entry which may have been then in existence. An affidavit may be made and filed for record in the county in which such interest in real property is located at any time on or after January 1, 1966, stating either that by January 1, 1966, no person was the owner of and in possession of such interest in real property by reason of such occurrence prior to said date of the use prohibited or restricted by a special limitation or condition subsequent, or the name of such person who was such owner in possession. Such affidavit shall further state that the affiant is of legal age and has personal knowledge of the ownership and possession of said interest in real property on January 1, 1966. Such affidavit shall not be made by anyone who then has a record interest in the real property described therein. Such recorded affidavit shall be deemed and held to be prima facie proof of the foregoing matters therein stated, and such recorded affidavit, and a copy of such record certified to be a true copy by the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein such affidavit is recorded shall be accepted in all courts of the state of Colorado as prima facie proof of the foregoing matters therein stated.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 938, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-58.

38-30-159.
Who may record notice of intention to claim possibility of reverter or right of entry.

The notice of claim required by section 38-30-158 that a new special limitation and possibility of reverter or a new condition subsequent and right of entry were created shall be duly verified on oath and shall be filed for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such interest in real property is located. Such notice may be filed for record by the person claiming to be the owner of such possibility of reverter or right of entry, or by any other person acting on his behalf if the person who is said to be such owner is:

Under a legal disability; or

Unable to assert a claim on his own behalf; or

One of a class, but whose identity cannot be established or is unknown or uncertain at the time of filing such notice of claim.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 939, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-59.

38-30-160.
Contents of notice - recording, indexing - effect.

To be effective and entitled to be filed for record, such notice shall contain all of the following matters:

An accurate and full description of all real property affected by such notice, which description shall be set forth in particular terms and not by general inclusions; but if such claim is founded upon a recorded instrument, the description in such notice may be the same as that contained in the recorded instrument upon which the claim is based;

The terms of the special limitation or condition subsequent from which the possibility of reverter or right of entry arises, and the name of the grantor or testator or person exercising such power of appointment who is said to have created the special limitation and possibility of reverter or condition subsequent and right of entry being claimed by such notice;

The names of all claimants or owners of the possibility of reverter or right of entry on whose behalf it is filed for record, except that if a claimant or owner is one of a class whose identity cannot be established or is unknown or uncertain at the time of filing such notice, then as to such claimant or owner it shall be sufficient to identify such class, and such notice shall be wholly ineffective as to all persons who are neither named nor members of such class.

The county clerk and recorder of each county shall accept every such notice presented to him which describes real property located in the county for which he serves and shall enter and record the same in the same way that deeds are recorded. In indexing such notice in his office, such county clerk and recorder shall enter such notice in the grantee indexes of deeds under the name of the person who has executed such notice and also under the names of all other persons named in said notice as claimants of or as owning such possibility of reverter or right of entry, and in the grantor indexes under the name of the grantor or testator or person exercising such power of appointment who is said to have created the special limitation and possibility of reverter or condition subsequent and right of entry being claimed by such notice.

The county clerk and recorder shall be entitled to charge the same fees for recording such notice and for indexing it in the grantor and grantee indexes as are charged for the recording and indexing of deeds.

If the real property affected by such notice is located in more than one county, such notice shall be recorded in each county wherein part of the real property is located, and such notice shall be wholly ineffective as to all real property located in any county in which it has not been recorded.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 940, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

118-1-60.

38-30-161.
Use prohibition or restriction affecting less or more real property - more or fewer use prohibitions or restrictions.

For purposes of sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-164, every inter vivos instrument and every will and every appointment shall be considered as purporting to prohibit or restrict a use of an interest in real property which has been previously prohibited or restricted notwithstanding that any previous inter vivos instrument or will or appointment included more real property or less real property or more or fewer use prohibitions or restrictions.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 941, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-61.